Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB628.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Homeowner Cease and Desist List Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."List." A homeowner cease and desist list compiled by the secretary under section 4(a)."Secretary." The Secretary of the Commonwealth.12345678910111213141516171819 "Zone." A homeowner cease and desist zone established under section 3(a).Section 3. Homeowner cease and desist zones.(a) Establishment.--If the secretary determines that owners of residential real property within a defined geographic area are subject to intense and repeated solicitation by real estate brokers and salespersons to place their property for sale with the real estate brokers or salespersons or are subject to intense and repeated solicitation by other persons regularly engaged in the trade or business of buying and selling real estate to sell the owner's residential real property, the secretary may establish a homeowner cease and desist zone.(b) Regulations.--A zone shall be bounded or otherwise specifically defined by department regulation.(c) Owner's statement.--After the secretary has established a zone, an owner of residential real property located within the zone may file an owner's statement with the secretary expressing the owner's wish not to be solicited by real estate brokers, salespersons or other persons regularly engaged in the trade or business of buying and selling real estate. The form and content of the statement shall be prescribed by the secretary.(d) Prohibition.--After a zone has been established, a real estate broker, salesperson or other person regularly engaged in the trade or business of buying and selling real estate may not solicit a listing from an owner who has filed an owner's statement with the secretary if the owner's name appears on a current list under section 4.(e) Forms of solicitation prohibited.--The prohibition on solicitation under this section shall apply to direct forms of solicitation, including the use of telephone, mail, personal 20250HB0628PN0639 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contact and other forms of direct solicitation as may be specified by the secretary.Section 4. Homeowner cease and desist list.(a) Compilation of list.--The secretary shall compile a cease and desist list for each zone established under section 3(a). In addition to other information as the secretary may deem appropriate, each list shall contain:(1) The name of each owner who has filed an owner's statement with the secretary.(2) The address of the property within the zone to which the owner's statement applies.(b) Notice to owners.--The secretary shall send to each owner who has filed an owner's statement a written acknowledgment of the secretary's receipt of the owner's statement and a pamphlet explaining the owner's rights in connection with inclusion on the list and the procedures and time limits applicable to the filing of complaints for violations.(c) Complaint.--An owner, or person on behalf of the owner, may file a complaint against a real estate broker, salesperson or other person regularly engaged in the trade or business of buying and selling real estate for a violation of section 3(d). The secretary shall allow an owner, or person on behalf of the owner, to amend a complaint or other report filed under this subsection by submitting other information or documentation as the secretary may require.(d) Printing and revisions to list.--The secretary shall print a list for each zone. The list shall be revised and reprinted on or before December 31 each year and shall be made available to the public and to real estate brokers, salespersons 20250HB0628PN0639 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or other persons regularly engaged in the trade or business of buying and selling real estate at a reasonable price to be set by the secretary. The secretary shall make additions and deletions to the list only at the time the list is reprinted and may not issue amendments to any printed list.Section 5. Restrictions on zones.The following shall apply to regulations under section 3(b):(1) A regulation establishing a cease and desist zone may not be effective for longer than five years. The secretary may readopt the regulation to continue the zone for additional periods not to exceed five years each.(2) If a regulation establishing a zone has expired or has been repealed, all owner's statements filed with the secretary under that regulation shall also expire.(3) An owner may file a new owner's statement with the secretary if a new regulation is adopted establishing a zone containing the owner's property.(4) Once the boundaries of a zone have been established by regulation, the boundaries may not be changed except by repeal of the existing regulation and adoption of a new regulation establishing the new boundaries.Section 6. Penalties.(a) Written warning and fines.--A person who violates this act shall:(1) For a first violation, receive a written warning from the department.(2) For a second violation, be fined $1,000.(3) For a third violation, be fined $5,000.(4) For a fourth and any subsequent violation, be fined $5,000, and the department shall report the violations to the 20250HB0628PN0639 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State Real Estate Commission.(b) Separate violations.--Each time a person contacts an owner of residential real property included on a list after having received a written warning under subsection (a)(1) shall be considered a separate violation.Section 7. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit an owner of residential real property within a cease and desist zone from contracting with a real estate broker, salesperson or other person regularly engaged in the trade or business of buying and selling real estate for the purpose of selling the owner's residential real property.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0628PN0639 - 5 - 1234567891011121314